Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 3
FAMILY SUPPORT SERVICES

25.5-10-301. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the service delivery system for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities emphasize community living for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and provide supports to persons that enable them to enjoy typical lifestyles. One way to accomplish this is to recognize that families are the greatest resource available to persons who have an intellectual and developmental disability and that families must be supported in their role as primary care givers. The general assembly finds that supporting families in their effort to provide supports for their family members at home is more efficient, cost-effective, and humane than maintaining persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities in out-of-home residential settings. In recognition of the importance of families, the general assembly states that the following principles should be used as guidelines in developing programs to support a family that has a child with disabilities:

Families of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities are best able to determine their own needs and preferences and should be empowered to make decisions concerning necessary, desirable, and appropriate services and supports;

Families must receive the services and supports necessary to care for their children at home;

Family support must be responsive to the needs of the entire family unit;

Family support must be sensitive to the unique strengths and needs of individual families;

Family support must build on existing social networks and natural sources of support;

Family support is needed throughout the life span of the person who has a disability;

Family support must encourage the inclusion of people with intellectual and developmental disabilities within the community;

Family support services must be flexible enough to accommodate unique needs of families as they evolve over time;

Family support services must be consistent with the cultural preferences and orientations of individual families;

Family support services should be comprehensive and coordinated across the numerous agencies likely to provide resources, supports, or services to families;

Family support services should be based on the principles of sharing ordinary places, developing meaningful relationships, learning things that are useful, making choices, as well as increasing the status and enhancing the reputation of people served;

Supports should be developed by the state that are necessary, desirable, and appropriate to support families;

Intellectual and developmental disabilities programs and policies must enhance the development of the person with an intellectual and developmental disability and the family;

State programs should provide sufficient services and supports to enable families to keep their family members with intellectual and developmental disabilities at home;

A comprehensive, coordinated system of supports to families effectively uses existing resources and minimizes gaps in supports to families and persons in all areas of the state;

Services and supports provided through the family support program must be closely coordinated with early intervention services and must foster collaboration and cooperation with all agencies providing services and supports to infants and preschool children; and

Any rights, entitlements, services, or supports created by this part 3 are not to be considered a limitation, modification, or infringement on any existing rights, entitlements, services, or supports, otherwise expressly provided by this article.

In addition, the general assembly recognizes that the state department has for several years developed and maintained a family resource service program that provides support services to families of children with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are at risk of out-of-home placement. Because of the success of this program the general assembly recommends that this valuable program be continued and expanded so that more families in this state are able to receive appropriate services, supports, and assistance needed to stabilize the family unit. In recognition of the basic goal to support families, on an individual family basis, in maintaining a person with an intellectual and developmental disability at home and in recognition of the principles stated in subsection (1) of this section, the general assembly declares that its purpose in enacting this part 3 is to create, subject to annual appropriation, a comprehensive statewide family support service program.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1781, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-401 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-302. Purpose.

The purpose of the family support services program created in this part 3 is to provide support to families in their role as primary care givers for a family member with an intellectual and developmental disability.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1782, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-402 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-303. Administration - duties of department.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the state department shall administer the family support services program and shall coordinate family support services with other existing services provided to families and individuals. Family support services must be provided in a manner that develops comprehensive, responsive, and flexible support to families in their role as the primary care givers for a family member with an intellectual and developmental disability.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department may contract with community-centered boards and other service providers approved by the state department to provide family support services in accordance with this part 3. Programs developed shall be flexible in order to address individual family needs.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state department may contract with case management agencies or entities approved by the state department to provide family support services in accordance with this part 3. Programs developed shall be flexible in order to address individual family needs.

In administering the family support services program, the state department shall have the following duties:

To design the program;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] To pursue a family support model 200 waiver for approval by the federal health care financing administration in order to utilize medicaid funds for the provision of family support services, implemented subject to appropriation;

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

To pursue a family support model 200 waiver for approval by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services in order to utilize medicaid funds for the provision of family support services, implemented subject to appropriation;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(c) is effective until July 1, 2024.] To develop rules to be promulgated by the state board pursuant to section 25.5-10-306, with consultation from service providers, including representatives of families of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(c) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

To develop rules to be promulgated by the state board pursuant to section 25.5-10-306, with consultation from service agencies, including representatives of families of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

To allocate funds;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(e) is effective until July 1, 2024.] To coordinate training and provide technical assistance to community-centered boards and service providers;

(e)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(e) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

To coordinate training and provide technical assistance to case management agencies or entities approved to provide family support services;

To monitor and evaluate the program;

To coordinate contracts, expenditures, and billing of the program; and

To recommend changes in the program.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, out of the appropriation to the state department for community programs in the general appropriation act, the state department is authorized to use up to seven percent of such appropriation allocated for family support services to pay for administrative costs within the state department and the community-centered boards.

(4)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, out of the appropriation to the state department for community programs in the general appropriation act, the state department is authorized to use up to seven percent of such appropriation allocated for family support services to pay for administrative costs within the state department and the service agency.

The state department shall take any necessary action relating to the termination and wind up of the Colorado family support loan fund as created in section 25.5-10-402 prior to its repeal. The state department shall receive payments relating to outstanding loans made from the Colorado family support loan fund as created in section 25.5-10-402 prior to its repeal, which payments shall be transferred to the state treasurer and credited to the family support services fund created in section 25.5-10-303.5.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1783, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(5) added, (HB 17-1078), ch. 27, p. 82, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2), (3)(b), (3)(c), (3)(e), and (4) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 343, § 47, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-404 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-304. Family support councils.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department shall ensure that each community-centered board establishes a family support council in each community-centered board designated service area. The family support councils shall consist of professionals, interested citizens, family members of persons with an intellectual and developmental disability, and persons with an intellectual and developmental disability with a majority of the council being made up of family members.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state department shall ensure that each case management agency or service agency approved to provide family support services establishes a family support council in each defined service area. The family support councils must consist of professionals, interested citizens, family members of persons with an intellectual and developmental disability, and persons with an intellectual and developmental disability with a majority of the council being made up of family members.

The family support council shall:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Provide direction and assistance to the community-centered board in the development of a family support plan for the designated service area;

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Provide direction and assistance to the case management agency in the development of a family support plan for the defined service area;

Make recommendations regarding other family supports or services not specifically listed in this part 3;

Monitor the implementation of the supports or services provided pursuant to the plan; and

Provide a written report to the state department of its involvement in the duties specified in this subsection (2).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1783, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 344, § 48, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-405 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-305. Authorized family support services.

The family support services included in this program include, but are not limited to, family support grants, family support services coordination, information and referral, educational materials, emergency and outreach services, and other person- and family-centered assistance services such as:

Medical and dental expenses not covered by medical or health insurance or other programs;

Insurance expenses;

Respite;

Mobility aids; adaptive equipment; assistive technology, including the cost of therapies essential for a child's development, as prescribed by a physician or specialized therapist; and home adaptations;

Home health services and therapies;

Family counseling, training, and support groups;

Recreation and leisure needs;

Transportation;

Special diets, clothing, materials, and equipment; and

Homemaker services.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1784, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-406 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-305.5. Family support services fund - creation.

The family support services fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money transferred to the fund from the Colorado family support loan fund as created in section 25.5-10-402 prior to its repeal, payments relating to outstanding loans made from the Colorado family support loan fund as created in section 25.5-10-402 prior to its repeal, and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the state department may expend money from the fund for necessary expenditures relating to the administration of outstanding loans made from the Colorado family support loan fund as created in section 25.5-10-402 prior to its repeal, and to provide family support services pursuant to this part 3.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1078), ch. 27, p. 81, § 3, effective July 1.

25.5-10-306. Rules.

The state board shall develop rules concerning:

Further definition of services and supports to be provided by the family support services program described in this part 3;

The requirements for eligibility for services and supports;

The manner of providing services and supports; and

The size, makeup, and duties of family support councils.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1784, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-407 as it existed prior to 2013.